Washington statutes.
RCW 39.80.040

Procurement of architectural and engineering services—Submission of statement of qualifications and performance data—Participation by minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms.

In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the agency, together with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, the firm deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and guidelines shall include a plan to ensure that minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to compete for and obtain public contracts for services. The level of participation by minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms shall be consistent with their general availability within the professional communities involved. For the 2015-2017 biennium the procurement for services related to modular classrooms may be expedited.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6010; 2010 c 5 s 10; 1981 c 61 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 35: See note following RCW 28B.10.027.

Purpose—Construction—2010 c 5: See notes following RCW 43.60A.010.

Effective date—1981 c 61: See note following RCW 39.80.010.